Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1551
Special election by mail; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who (1) impersonates or makes a false representation in order to obtain a ballot for an election to be held by mail as provided in sections 32-952 to 32-959, (2) knowingly connives to help a person to vote such a ballot illegally, (3) destroys, steals, marks, or mutilates any such ballot after the same has been voted or aids or abets another to do so, (4) delays in delivering such a ballot to the election commissioner or county clerk to prevent the ballot from arriving in time to be counted, (5) in any manner aids or attempts to aid any person to vote such a ballot unlawfully, (6) hinders or attempts to hinder a registered voter from voting any such ballot, or (7) hinders or attempts to hinder any official from delivering or counting any such ballot shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1996, LB 964, § 13.